Washington statutes.
RCW 39.08.015

Liability for failure to take bond.

If any board of county commissioners of any county, or mayor and common council of any incorporated city or town, or tribunal transacting the business of any municipal corporation shall fail to take such bond as herein required, such county, incorporated city or town, or other municipal corporation, shall be liable to the persons mentioned in RCW 39.08.010, to the full extent and for the full amount of all such debts so contracted by such contractor.

[ 1909 c 207 s 2; RRS s 1160. Prior: 1888 p 15 s 2. Formerly RCW 39.08.070.]